California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 the department shall consider provider related costs of the product that include, but are not limited to, shipping, handling, storage, and delivery.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 92) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 93.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.21.

(a) An assistive device and sickroom supply dealer may not bill the Medi-Cal program for prosthetic and orthotic appliances.

(b) A pharmacy may not bill the Medi-Cal program for prosthetic or orthotic appliances, unless the pharmacy is certified by the National Community Pharmacists Association and only for prosthetic and orthotic appliances that have been identified pursuant to subdivision (c) or otherwise approved by the department.

(c) The department shall establish a list of covered services and maximum allowable reimbursement rates, subject to Section 14107.7, for prosthetic and orthotic appliances, and the list shall be published in provider manuals.

(d) Reimbursement for prosthetic and orthotic appliances, as defined in Section 51160 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, may not exceed 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare program for the same or similar services.

(e) The department shall repeal Section 51515 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as it read on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(f) The department may implement this section by provider manual or bulletin.
 Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, actions under this section shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act or to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 63.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.22.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department develop reimbursement rates for clinical laboratory or laboratory services that are comparable to the payment amounts received from other payers for clinical laboratory or laboratory services. Development of these rates will enable the department to reimburse clinical laboratory or laboratory service providers in compliance with state and federal law.

(2) (A) The requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 51501 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations shall not apply to laboratory providers reimbursed under the new rate methodology developed for clinical
 laboratories or laboratory services pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), laboratory providers reimbursed under any payment reductions implemented pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 51501 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations until July 1, 2015.

(3) Reimbursement to providers for clinical laboratory or laboratory services shall not exceed the lowest of the following:

(A) The amount billed.

(B) The charge to the general public.

(C) (i) For dates of service before July 1,
 2022, 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance established by the federal Medicare program for the same or similar services.

(ii) For dates of service on or after July 1, 2022, 100 percent of the lowest maximum allowance established by the federal Medicare program for the same or similar services.

(D) A reimbursement rate based on an average of the lowest amount that other payers and other state Medicaid programs are paying for similar clinical laboratory or laboratory services.

(4) (A) In addition to the payment reductions implemented pursuant to Section 14105.192, payments shall be reduced by up to 10 percent for clinical laboratory or laboratory services, as defined in Section 51137.2 of Title 22
 of the California Code of Regulations, for dates of service on and after July 1, 2012. The payment reductions pursuant to this paragraph shall continue until the new rate methodology under this subdivision has been approved
 by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment Program pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132 shall be exempt from the payment reduction specified in this section.

(5) (A) For purposes of establishing reimbursement rates for clinical laboratory or laboratory services pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3), laboratory service providers shall submit data reports according to the following schedule:

(i) The data initially provided shall be for the 2018 calendar year. For each subsequent reporting year, the data shall be based on the previous calendar year.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), “reporting year” means 2019 and
 every third year thereafter.

(B) A data report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall specify the provider’s lowest amounts other payers are paying, including other state Medicaid programs and private insurance, minus discounts and rebates. The specific data required for submission under this subparagraph and the format for the data submission shall be determined and specified by the department after receiving stakeholder input pursuant to paragraph (7).

(C) The data submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be used to determine reimbursement rates by procedure code based on an average of the lowest amount other payers are paying providers for similar clinical laboratory or laboratory services, excluding significant deviations of cost or volume factors and with consideration
 to geographical areas. The department shall have the discretion to determine the specific methodology and factors used in the development of the lowest average amount under this subparagraph to ensure compliance with federal Medicaid law and regulations as specified in paragraph (9).

(D) For purposes of subparagraph (C), the department may contract with a vendor for the purposes of collecting payment data reports from clinical laboratories, analyzing payment information, and calculating a proposed rate.

(E) The proposed rates calculated by the vendor, as described in subparagraph (D), may be used in determining the lowest reimbursement rate for clinical laboratories or laboratory services in accordance with paragraph (3).

(F) Data
 reports submitted to the department shall be certified by the provider’s certified financial officer or an authorized individual.

(G) Clinical laboratory providers that fail to submit data reports within 30 working days from the time requested by the department shall be subject to the suspension standards of subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 14123.

(6) Data reports provided to the department pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(7) The department shall seek stakeholder input on the ratesetting methodology.

(8) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(9) (A) The department shall implement this section in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations. The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(B) In determining whether federal financial
 participation is available, the director shall determine whether the rates and payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(C) To the extent that the director determines that the rates and payments do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any reimbursement rate, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate or payment and may revise the rate or payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements. The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 10 days prior to revising the rate or payment to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(b) Reimbursement rates developed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and the changes made by the act that added this subdivision shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2020, and on July 1 of every third year thereafter.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for dates of service from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, the department shall establish the reimbursement rates for clinical laboratory or laboratory services at the rates in effect and approved in the Medi-Cal State Plan as of December 31, 2019, pursuant to Section 14105.222.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 162.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.221.

Notwithstanding Section 51501(a) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, donation of, or discounts for, clinical laboratory tests or examinations or laboratory services to a federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the purpose of serving its uninsured patients, shall not be considered as a basis for the reduction of Medi-Cal payments below the reimbursement rate established pursuant to Section
 14105.22.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.222.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14105.22, the department shall not seek to retroactively implement the reductions and limitations to the reimbursement for clinical laboratory or laboratory services set forth in Section 14105.22 for dates of service from January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive. The payment reductions implemented pursuant to Section 14105.192 shall continue to apply for clinical laboratory or laboratory services.

(b) The department shall not seek to recoup any overpayments for clinical laboratory or laboratory services resulting from the reductions and limitations to the reimbursement for clinical laboratory or laboratory services pursuant to Section
 14105.22 for dates of service from January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive. Any overpayments for clinical laboratory or laboratory services resulting from the reductions implemented pursuant to Section 14105.192 shall continue to be recouped.

(c) For dates of service from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, the department shall establish the reimbursement rates for clinical laboratory or laboratory services at the rates in effect and approved in the Medi-Cal State Plan as of December 31, 2019.

(d) For dates of services on or after July 1, 2022, the department shall establish the reimbursement rates for clinical laboratory or laboratory services pursuant to Section 14105.22.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(f) The department shall implement this section in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations. The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 377.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.23.

(a) Reimbursement for portable X-ray transportation services, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 51531 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall not exceed 100 percent of the lowest maximum allowance for California established by the federal Medicare Program for the same or similar services.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14105 and the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may establish the rates of reimbursement for the services described in subdivision (a) by means of a provider bulletin or manual, or similar instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 80, Sec. 23.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.24.

(a) Clinics and hospital outpatient departments, except for emergency rooms, owned or operated by Los Angeles County that participated in the California Section 1115 Medicaid Demonstration Project for Los Angeles County (No. 11-W-00076/9) and received 100 percent cost-based reimbursement pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions of that waiver shall continue to be reimbursed under a cost-based
 methodology on and after July 1, 2005.

(b) Reimbursement to clinics and hospitals described in subdivision (a) shall be at 100 percent of reasonable and allowable costs for Medi-Cal services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries. Reasonable and allowable costs shall be determined in accordance with applicable cost-based reimbursement provisions of the following regulations and publications:

(1) The Medicare reimbursement methodology as specified at Sections 405.2460 to 405.2470, inclusive, of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, together with applicable definitions in Subpart X of Part 405 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the extent those definitions are applied by the department in connection with payments to federally qualified health centers in California.

(2) Cost reimbursement principles
 outlined in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of Part 405 and Part 413, the provisions of Part 405 shall govern.

(3) “Cost Principles for State, Local, and Indian Tribe Governments” (OMB Circular A-87).

(4) “Rural Health and FQHC Manual” (CMS Publication 27).

(5) Subdivision (e) of Section 14087.325 and any implementing regulations.

(c) The methodology for reimbursement adopted by the state to comply with Section 1396a(aa) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall not be applicable to clinics and hospitals that are paid pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall be implemented
 on the effective date established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for an amendment to the California Medicaid State Plan that approves the cost-based reimbursement methodology for the clinics and hospitals described in subdivision (b).

(e) (1) Payments received by clinics and hospital outpatient departments described in subdivision (a), for services rendered to populations described in Section 14182, shall be equivalent to what otherwise would have been received under this section on a fee-for-service basis.

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent permitted under federal law and when federal financial participation is available.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14105, and the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer the cost-based rates of reimbursement described in this section by means of provider bulletins or manuals, or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   (SB 208)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the maximum rate of reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program for any service or item that is a benefit under Part B of the Medicare program, excluding physician and diagnostic clinical laboratory services, shall not exceed the lowest maximum allowance established by the federal Medicare program for that service or item in any area of the state.

(b) The director shall reduce
 the rate of reimbursement for any service or item, as required, to comply with subdivision (a).

(c) The director shall administer this section and establish standards, procedures, and rates of reimbursement, as the director deems necessary in carrying out this section. Reimbursement rates are not required to be adopted as regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.26.

(a) Each eligible facility, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), may, in addition to the rate of payment that the facility would otherwise receive for skilled nursing services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided in this section.

(b) (1) Projects eligible for supplemental reimbursement shall include any new capital projects for which final plans have been submitted to the appropriate
 review agency after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2003. For purposes of this section, “capital project” means the construction, expansion, replacement, remodeling, or renovation of an eligible facility, including buildings and fixed equipment. A “capital project” does not include the provision of furnishings or of equipment that is not fixed equipment.

(2) A facility shall be eligible only if the submitting entity had all of the following additional characteristics during the 1998 calendar year:

(A) Provided services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(B) Was a distinct part of an acute care hospital providing skilled nursing care and supportive care to patients whose primary need is for the availability of skilled nursing care on an extended basis. For the purposes of this section, “acute care hospital” means the
 facilities defined in subdivision (a) or (b), or both, of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Had not less than 300 licensed skilled nursing beds.

(D) Had an average skilled nursing Medi-Cal patient census of not less than 80 percent of the total skilled nursing patient days.

(E) Was owned by a county or city and county.

(c) (1) An eligible facility seeking to qualify for supplemental reimbursement shall submit documentation to the department regarding debt service on revenue bonds or other financing instruments used for financing the capital project.

(2) The department shall confirm in writing project eligibility under this section.

(d) (1) Capital projects receiving funding shall include only the upgrading or construction of buildings and equipment to a level required by currently accepted medical practice standards, including projects designed to correct Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals and Health Systems, fire and life safety, seismic, or other related regulatory standards.

(2) Capital projects receiving funding may expand service capacity as needed to maintain current or reasonably foreseeable necessary bed capacity to meet the needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries after giving consideration to bed capacity needed for other patients, including unsponsored patients.

(3) Supplemental reimbursement shall only be made for capital projects, or for that portion of capital projects that provide skilled nursing services,
 and that are available and accessible to patients eligible for services under this chapter.

(e) An eligible facility’s supplemental reimbursement for a capital project qualifying pursuant to this section shall be calculated and paid as follows:

(1) For any fiscal year for which the facility is eligible to receive supplemental reimbursement, the facility shall report to the department the amount of debt service on the revenue bonds or other financing instruments issued to finance the capital project.

(2) For each fiscal year in which an eligible facility requests reimbursement, the department shall establish the ratio of skilled nursing Medi-Cal days of care provided by the eligible facility to total skilled nursing patient days of care provided by the eligible facility. The ratio shall be established using data
 obtained from audits performed by the department, and shall be applied to the corresponding fiscal year of debt service on the revenue bonds or other financing instruments issued to finance the capital project.

(3) The amount of debt service that will be submitted to the federal Health Care Financing Administration for the purpose of claiming reimbursement for each fiscal year shall equal the amount determined annually in paragraph (1) multiplied by the percentage figure determined in paragraph (2).

(4) The supplemental reimbursement to an eligible facility shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (j).

(5) In no instance shall the total amount of supplemental reimbursement received under this section combined
 with that received from all other sources dedicated exclusively to debt service exceed 100 percent of the debt service for the capital project over the life of the loan, revenue bond, or other financing mechanism.

(6) A facility qualifying for and receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall continue to receive reimbursement until the qualifying loan, revenue bond, or other financing mechanism is paid off, and as long as the facility meets the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(7) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed under a payment methodology based on skilled nursing services provided to Medi-Cal patients at the eligible facility, either on a per diem basis, a per discharge basis, or any other federally permissible basis. The department shall seek approval from the federal Health Care
 Financing Administration for the payment methodology to be utilized, and shall not make any payment pursuant to this section prior to obtaining that approval.

(8) The supplemental reimbursement provided by this section shall not commence prior to the date upon which the hospital submits to the department a copy of the certificate of occupancy for the capital project.

(f) (1) It is the Legislature’s intent in enacting this section to provide a funding source for a portion of the construction costs of eligible facilities without any expenditure from the state General Fund.

(2) The state share of the amount of the debt service submitted to the federal Health Care Financing Administration for purposes of supplemental reimbursement shall be paid with county-only funds and certified to the state as
 provided in subdivision (g). Any amount of the costs of the capital project that are not reimbursed by federal funds shall be borne solely by the eligible facility.

(3) Prior to receiving any funding through this section, an eligible facility shall demonstrate its ability to cover all of the anticipated costs of construction, including those not reimbursed through federal funding.

(g) The county or city and county, on behalf of any eligible facility, shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for the capital project are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as
 specified by the department.

(3) Submit data, as specified by the department, to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, the records as specified by the department in order to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible facility is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Health Care Financing Administration.

(h) The department may require that any county or city and county seeking supplemental reimbursement under this section enter into an interagency agreement with the department for the purpose of implementing this section.

(i) All payments received by an eligible facility pursuant to this section shall be placed
 in a special account, the funds of which shall be used exclusively for the payment of expenses related to the eligible capital project.

(j) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may, for federal purposes, limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall become inoperative.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures for debt service that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(k) Supplemental reimbursement paid under this section shall not duplicate any reimbursement received by an eligible facility pursuant to this chapter for construction costs that would otherwise be eligible for reimbursement under this section. In no event shall the total Medi-Cal reimbursement pursuant to this chapter to a facility eligible under this section be less than what would have been paid had this section not existed.

(l) In the event there is a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the administrator of
 the federal Health Care Financing Administration that the supplemental reimbursement provided in this section must be made to any facility not described therein, this section shall become immediately inoperative.

(m) Any and all funds expended pursuant to this section shall be subject to review and audit by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 198.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subdivision (l).)
-------------------------------------------

14105.27.

(a) Each eligible facility, as described in subdivision (b) may, in addition to the rate of payment that the facility would otherwise receive for skilled nursing services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided in this section.

(b) A facility shall be eligible for supplemental reimbursement only if the facility has all of the following characteristics continuously during the department’s rate year:

(1) Provides services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) Is either of the following:

(A) For the department’s rate year beginning August 1, 2001, and for subsequent rate years, a distinct part of an acute care hospital providing skilled nursing services. For purposes of this section, “acute care hospital” means a facility described by subdivision (a) or (b), or both, of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) For the department’s rate year beginning August 1, 2006, and for subsequent rate years, a state home, as defined in Section 101 (19) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(3) Is owned or operated by the state, or by a county, city, city and county, or health care district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 23 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) An eligible facility’s supplemental
 reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be calculated and paid as follows:

(1) The supplemental reimbursement to an eligible facility, as described in paragraph (4), shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(2) In no instance shall the amount certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), when combined with the amount received from all other sources of reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program, exceed 100 percent of allowable costs, as determined pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan, for distinct part skilled nursing services at each facility.

(3) Costs associated with the provision of subacute services pursuant to Section 14132.25 shall not be certified for supplemental reimbursement pursuant
 to this section.

(4) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed under a payment methodology based on skilled nursing services provided to Medi-Cal patients at the eligible facility, either on a per diem basis, a per discharge basis, or any other federally permissible basis. The department shall seek approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the payment methodology to be utilized, and shall not make any payment pursuant to this section prior to obtaining that approval.

(d) (1) It is the Legislature’s intent in enacting this section to provide the supplemental reimbursement described in this section without any expenditure from the General Fund. An eligible facility, as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section, shall enter into, and maintain, an
 agreement with the department for the purposes of implementing this section and reimbursing the department for the costs of administering this section.

(2) The state share of the supplemental reimbursement submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for purposes of claiming federal financial participation shall be paid only with funds from the governmental entities described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and certified to the state as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) The particular governmental entity, described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), on behalf of any eligible facility shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for distinct part nursing
 facility services are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department.

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, any records specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible facility is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(f) The department may require that any governmental entity, described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), seeking supplemental reimbursement under this section enter into an interagency
 agreement with the department for the purpose of implementing this section.

(g) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals, including a federal medicaid waiver, for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall become inoperative.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures for the services described in subdivision (e) that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(h) In the event there is a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental reimbursement provided in this section must be made to any facility not described in this section, this section shall become immediately inoperative.

(i) All funds expended pursuant to this section are subject to review and audit by the department.

(j) Supplemental reimbursement made pursuant to this section shall be subject to a
 reconciliation process established in the Medi-Cal State Plan to ensure that it is not made in excess of allowable costs, and to ensure that it is made up to allowable costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section conditionally inoperative as provided in subds. (g) and (h).)
-------------------------------------------

14105.28.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to design a new Medi-Cal inpatient hospital reimbursement methodology based on diagnosis-related groups that more effectively ensures all of the following:

(1) Encouragement of access by setting higher payments for patients with more serious conditions.

(2) Rewards for efficiency by allowing hospitals to retain savings from decreased length of stays and decreased costs per day.

(3) Improvement of transparency and understanding by defining the “product” of a hospital in a way that is understandable to both clinical and financial managers.

(4) Improvement of fairness so that different hospitals receive similar payment for similar care and payments to hospitals are adjusted for significant cost factors that are outside the hospital’s control.

(5) Encouragement of administrative efficiency and minimizing administrative burdens on hospitals and the Medi-Cal program.

(6) That payments depend on data that has high consistency and credibility.

(7) Simplification of the process for determining and making payments to the hospitals.

(8) Facilitation of improvement of quality and outcomes.

(9) Facilitation of implementation of state and federal provisions related to hospital acquired conditions.

(10) Support of provider compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements.

(b) (1) (A) (i) The department shall develop and implement a payment methodology based on diagnosis-related groups, subject to federal approval, that reflects the costs and staffing levels associated with quality of care for patients in all general acute care hospitals in state and out of
 state, including Medicare critical access hospitals, but excluding public hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, and rehabilitation hospitals, which include alcohol and drug rehabilitation hospitals.

(ii) The payment methodology developed pursuant to this section shall be implemented on July 1, 2012, or on the date upon which the director executes a declaration certifying that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and the methodology is sufficient for formal implementation, whichever is later.

(B) The diagnosis-related group-based payments shall apply to all claims, except claims for psychiatric inpatient days, rehabilitation inpatient days, managed care inpatient days, and swing bed stays for long-term care services, provided, however, that psychiatric and rehabilitation inpatient days shall be excluded regardless of whether the stay was in a distinct-part unit. The
 department may exclude or include other claims and services as may be determined during the development of the payment methodology.

(C) Implementation of the new payment methodology shall be coordinated with the development and implementation of the replacement Medicaid Management Information System pursuant to the contract entered into pursuant to Section 14104.3, effective on May 3, 2010.

(2) The department shall evaluate alternative diagnosis-related group algorithms for the new Medi-Cal reimbursement system for the hospitals to which paragraph (1) applies. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of all of the following factors:

(A) The basis for determining diagnosis-related group base price, and whether different base prices should be used taking into account factors such as geographic
 location, hospital size, teaching status, the local hospital wage area index, and any other variables that may be relevant.

(B) Classification of patients based on appropriate acuity classification systems.

(C) Hospital case mix factors.

(D) Geographic or regional differences in the cost of operating facilities and providing care.

(E) Payment models based on diagnosis-related groups used in other states.

(F) Frequency of grouper updates for the diagnosis-related groups.

(G) The extent to which the particular grouping algorithm for the diagnosis-related groups accommodates ICD-10 diagnosis and procedure codes, and applicable
 requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(H) The basis for calculating relative weights for the various diagnosis-related groups.

(I) Whether policy adjusters should be used, for which care categories they should be used, and the frequency of updates to the policy adjusters.

(J) The extent to which the payment system is budget neutral and can be expected to result in state budget savings in future years.

(K) Other factors that may be relevant to determining payments, including, but not limited to, add-on payments, outlier payments, capital payments, payments for medical education, payments in the case of early transfers of patients, and payments based on performance and quality of care.

(c) The department shall submit to the Legislature a status report on the implementation of this section on April 1, 2011, April 1, 2012, April 1, 2013, and April 1, 2014.

(d) The alternatives for a new system described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be developed in consultation with recognized experts with experience in hospital reimbursement, economists, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and other interested parties.

(e) In implementing this section, the department may contract, as necessary, on a bid or nonbid basis, for professional consulting services from nationally recognized higher education and research institutions, or other qualified individuals and entities not associated with a particular hospital or hospital group, with demonstrated expertise in hospital reimbursement
 systems. The rate setting system described in subdivision (b) shall be developed with all possible expediency. This subdivision establishes an accelerated process for issuing contracts pursuant to this section and contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.
